Maryland, session 2026, HB0736.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0736*

HOUSE BILL 736
(g) (1) “Distilled spirits” means a distilled alcoholic beverage.
(2) “Distilled spirits” includes:
(i) alcohol;
(ii) brandy;
(iii) cordials;
(iv) gin;
(v) liqueur;
(vi) rum;
(vii) vodka;
(viii) whiskey; and
(ix) solutions or mixtures of distilled spirits except fortified wines.
(K) “READY–TO–DRINK COCKTAIL” MEANS A BEVERAGE THAT:
(1) CONTAINS DISTILLED SPIRITS MIXED WITH NONALCOHOLIC
BEVERAGES AND MAY CONTAIN WINE;
(2) IS 12% OR LESS ALCOHOL BY VOLUME; AND
(3) IS CONTAINED IN ORIGINAL PACKAGING CONSISTING OF A
CONTAINER THAT IS NOT MORE THAN 16 OUNCES.
[(k)] (L) “Resident dealer” means a person who is required to obtain a resident
dealer’s permit under § 2–125 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article.
[(l)] (M) (1) “Retail dealer” means a person who buys an alcoholic beverage
for sale to a consumer.
(2) “Retail dealer” includes a county department of liquor control, a liquor
control board, or the Alcohol Beverage Services for Montgomery County that operates a
dispensary.
[(m)] (N) (1) “Wholesaler” means a person who buys or imports an alcoholic
beverage for sale to another person for resale.

HOUSE BILL 736 3
(2) “Wholesaler” includes a county department of liquor control, a liquor
control board, or the Alcohol Beverage Services for Montgomery County that operates a
wholesale dispensary.
[(n)] (O) (1) “Wine” means a fermented alcoholic beverage.
(2) “Wine” includes:
(i) carbonated, flavored, imitation, sparkling, or still wine;
(ii) champagne;
(iii) cider;
(iv) fortified wine;
(v) perry;
(vi) sake; and
(vii) vermouth.
5–105.
(a) (1) Except as provided in PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND
subsection (d) of this section, the alcoholic beverage tax rate for distilled spirits is:
[(1)] (I) $1.50 for each gallon or 39.63 cents for each liter; and
[(2)] (II) if distilled spirits contain a percentage of alcohol greater than
100 proof, an additional tax, for each 1 proof over 100 proof, of 1.5 cents for each gallon or
0.3963 cents for each liter.
(2) THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE TAX RATE FOR READY–TO–DRINK
COCKTAILS IS 60 CENTS FOR EACH GALLON OR 15.85 CENTS FOR EACH LITER.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, the alcoholic beverage tax
rate for wine is 40 cents for each gallon or 10.57 cents for each liter.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, the alcoholic beverage tax
rate on beer and mead is 9 cents for each gallon or 2.3778 cents for each liter.
(d) The tax imposed under § 5–102(b) of this subtitle shall equal the amount that
the discriminating jurisdiction charges a Maryland licensee or permit holder.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July

HOUSE BILL 736
1, 2026.